Illinois, session 104th, HB2432.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 5Section 18a-200.1 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/18a-200.1 new)7    Sec. 18a-200.1. Relocator permit fee charges. 8Notwithstanding the provisions set forth in Sections 18a-200 9and 18a-300, the Commission shall allow commercial relocators 10to recover, as part of their lawful fees and charges, towing 11permit fees or vehicle release fees that are lawfully adopted 12by a unit of local government and imposed by a law enforcement 13agency as a necessary administrative fee in order to 14effectuate an existing relocator program in the unit of local 15government where the law enforcement agency and relocator 16operate. The Commission may set the maximum amount of towing 17permit fees or vehicle release fees that a commercial 18relocator may recover.